Utah statutes.
26-18-2.1.   Division -- Creation.

There is created, within the department, the Division of Health Care Financing which shall be responsible for implementing, organizing, and maintaining the Medicaid program and the Utah Medical Assistance Program established in Section 26-18-10, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and applicable federal law.

